Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-1946
Decision of department; appeal; procedure.

Any party to
a decision of the department under the Children's Residential Facilities and
Placing Licensure Act may appeal such decision. The appeal shall be in accordance
with the Administrative Procedure Act.

Laws 2013, LB265, § 23.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.